Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-1532
Family support program; services and support; priorities.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall allocate medicaid waiver benefits under section 68-1530 based on appropriations by the Legislature for such waiver and give priority status in the following order:

(1) First, to disabled children and family units in crisis situations in which the disabled child tends to self-injure or injure siblings and other family members;

(2) Second, to disabled children who are at risk for placement in juvenile detention centers, other institutional settings, or out-of-home placements;

(3) Third, to disabled children whose primary caretakers are grandparents because no other family caregivers are available to provide care;

(4) Fourth, to families who have more than one disabled child residing in the family home; and

(5) Fifth, based on the date of application under the family support program.

Laws 2022, LB376, § 4.